src/morphology/stems/particles.lexc
LEXICON PCL
CJ ;
IJ ;
IJ_DAB_ADDITIONS ;
PT ;
PT_DAB_ADDITIONS ;

LEXICON CJ
giishpin:giishpin    CJ_TAG    " 1 if;  2 or else, otherwise" ; !Rand key:n73023754109n
giishpine:giishpine    CJ_TAG    " 1 if" ; !Rand key:n73023754407n
gye:gaye    CJ_TAG    " 1 and (coordinating);  2 also, as well, in addition, too (additive);  3 and then... (narrative sequencing);  4 as for, for one's part, with regard to..." ; !Rand key:n73032325988n
mii'sh:mii-sh    CJ_TAG    " 1 and so, so, then, so then" ; !Rand key:n73036925045n
shi:ashi    CJ_TAG    " 1 and (with numbers)" ; !Rand key:n73031386177n
gjiishpin:gijiishpin    CJ_TAG    " 1 if" ; !Rand key:n20114115-1-41n
jibwaa:Vv1jibwaa    CJ_TAG    " 1 before, at a time preceding (some other event or state)" ; !Rand key:n2011439-57-22n

LEXICON CJ_TAG
+Conj:0 CLOSED_PROTECTION ;

LEXICON IJ_DAB_ADDITIONS 
giibaadkamik:giibaadakamig      IJ_TAG  "1 It's absurd; It's ludricous; It's ridiculous" ; !Rand key:n20162256-35-28n
gchi-myisaach:gichi-mVv1yisaach IJ_TAG "1 How unfortunate." ; !Rand_key:n201622211-27-5n
gaansidam:gaanisidam            IJ_TAG "1 too bad, regrettable, unfortunate" ; !Rand key:n201622114-30-44n
!{Start Rand database dump 2024
zegendmaadkamik:zegendamaadakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 It’s so frightful!" ; !Rand key:n103000769958n
yaanh:yaany    IJ_TAG    " 1 Ah, poor kid. Ah, poor you. Oh, how cute. Oh, so cute. (expr said in a teasingly patronizing tone)" ; !Rand key:n103000767840n
!wops    IJ_TAG    " 1 Oops! " ; !Rand key:n103000758283n !DAB this is English
!wohoho    IJ_TAG    " 1 Ever silly. Ever ridiculous." ; !Rand key:n103000758275n !DAB: This won't play with syncope
way:Bv1way2    IJ_TAG    " 1 Pardon? What?" ; !Rand key:n103000756202n
wanh:Bv1wanh    IJ_TAG    " 1 Ha! (expr of triumph), Serves you right!" ; !Rand key:n103000756140n
shtaataayaa:Bv1shtaataayaa    IJ_TAG    " 1 Holy cow! Holy jeez! Holy moly! Holy smokes! Wow." ; !Rand key:n103000745012n
shisht:Bv1shisht    IJ_TAG    " 1 Holy cow! Holy jeez! Holy moly! Holy smokes! Wow. (said of something impressive)" ; !Rand key:n103000744451n
shiishtaahaa:Bv1shiishtaahaa    IJ_TAG    " 1 Holy cow! Holy jeez! Holy moly! Holy smokes! Wow." ; !Rand key:n103000744407n
she:Bv1she    IJ_TAG    " 1 Shame. (said to someone who says something coarse)" ; !Rand key:n103000743947n
oshti:Bv1washti    IJ_TAG    " 1 then [said in grudging consent]" ; !Rand key:n103004166596n
ngaa:Bv1ngaa    IJ_TAG    " 1 no" ; !Rand key:n103000711554n
ne:ne    IJ_TAG    " 1 Look! (directing attention to something in sight)" ; !Rand key:n103000711247n
ndakamik:Bv1ndagakmig    IJ_TAG    " 1 jeez (said in annoyance)" ; !Rand key:n103000697325n
nashke:Bv1nishke    IJ_TAG    " 1 Look! (directing attention to something in sight)" ; !Rand key:n103000696439n
mskwiigdeyaadkamik:miskwiigadeyaadkamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 So exasperating!, So frustrating!" ; !Rand key:n103000693857n
gwetaan'kamig:gagwetaanakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 Oh, my goodness! How terrible!" ; !Rand key:n103000643019n
gwensaatkamig:gwenisaatakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 How terrible. It’s terrible." ; !Rand key:n103000642977n
gwaansagkamik:gagwaanisagakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 How terrible! That’s terrible!" ; !Rand key:n103000642527n
gwaansaatkamik:gagwaanisaatakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 How terrible! That’s terrible!" ; !Rand key:n103000642503n
gshkonweyaatkamik:goshkonaweyaatakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 What a surprise!" ; !Rand key:n103000641759n
giisaadkamik:giiwVv1saadakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 too bad, unfortunate, regrettable" ; !Rand key:n103000596298n
giisaadaadkamik:giiwVv1saadaadakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 too bad, unfortunate, regrettable" ; !Rand key:n103000596294n
giibaadaadkamik:giibaadaadakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 How absurd!, So ludicrous!, So stupid! (of a plan or policy)" ; !Rand key:n103000583294n
gegesnaa:gegesBv1naa    IJ_TAG    " 1 jeez (expr of exasperation)" ; !Rand key:n103000571223n
aaniinda:aaniinda    IJ_TAG    " 1 For Pete’s sake, For goodness' sake, Oh jeez (expr of annoyance)" ; !Rand key:n102995930012n
maajiikmik:maajiikamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 Jeez; what a thing [to do], what a thing [to happen]" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdd24504d39bc1323320a01dd02n
maagzhaa:maagizhaa    IJ_TAG    " 1 coming along, so-so (Wk);  2 maybe (Sg)" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdd65bc4645b47823320a01dd02n
nigaawaatkamik:inigaawaatakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 hopeless" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdb171041ddb0fa23320a01dd02n
ni:Bv1ni    IJ_TAG    " 1 expr of triumph See! There you go! See what happened!" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdbc9a04a1aa9fa23320a01dd02n
mnwendmaatkamik:minwendamaatakamig    IJ_TAG    " 1 nice turn of events, a pleasing development" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd838044961b43e23320a01dd02n
wejeje:wejeje    IJ_TAG    " 1 expr. of mild alarm: oh-oh, uh-oh" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd7142044f5ae3823320a01dd02n
say:Bv1say2    IJ_TAG    " 1 yuck" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd5441c4994a98023320a01dd02n
aaniinda:aaniinda   IJ_TAG  "1 For Pete's sake! For goodness' sake, Jeez! My God!, Ever gross!, Ever sick!, How disgusting!" ; !Rand key:n200581212-36-27n
!End Rand database dump 2024}
gchi-miigwech:gichi-miigwech    IJ_TAG    " 1 thank you!, thanks!" ; !I don't think we want to let gchi attach to _every_ IJ
oohoohoo:oohoohoo      IJ_TAG  "1 Oh you!" ; !
waa:waa                 IJ_TAG "exclamation" ; !in OPD and freelang without any concrete definition
wiihaa:wiihaa           IJ_TAG "1 No way! (expression of disbelief)" ; !from MC sentences
